DTC P0337 [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]


id0102f1013500

DTC P0337

CKP sensor circuit low input

DETECTION CONDITION
•  The PCM monitors the input signal from the CKP sensor and the CMP sensor while the engine is running. If the input signal from the CKP sensor is not input while the PCM detects signal from the CMP sensor, the PCM determines that there is a malfunction in the CKP sensor circuit.
Diagnostic support note
•  The MIL illuminates if the PCM detects the above malfunction condition in the first drive cycle.
•  FREEZE FRAME DATA is available.
•  The DTC is stored in the PCM memory.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  CKP sensor malfunction
•  Connector or terminal malfunction
•  Loose CKP sensor installation bolt
•  Short to power supply in wiring harness between CKP sensor terminal C and PCM terminal 45
•  Short to power supply in wiring harness between CKP sensor terminal B and PCM terminal 65
•  Short to power supply in wiring harness between CKP sensor terminal A and PCM terminal 46
•  Short to ground in wiring harness between CKP sensor terminal C and PCM terminal 45
•  Short to ground in wiring harness between CKP sensor terminal A and PCM terminal 46
•  Open circuit in wiring harness between CKP sensor terminal C and PCM terminal 45
•  Open circuit in wiring harness between CKP sensor terminal B and PCM terminal 65
•  Open circuit in wiring harness between CKP sensor terminal A and PCM terminal 46
•  CKP sensor is dirty.
•  CKP sensor pulse wheel malfunction
•  Both CKP sensor wires are shorted to each other
•  CKP sensor malfunction
•  PCM malfunction

Diagnostic procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

ACTION

1
VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
•  Has FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
2
VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
•  Verify related Service Information availability.
•  Is any related repair information available?
Yes
Perform repair or diagnosis according to the available Service Information.
•  If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
3
VERIFY CURRENT SIGNAL STATUS: IS CONCERN INTERMITTENT OR CONSTANT?
•  Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
•  Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
•  Start the engine.
•  Is the same DTC present?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Intermittent concern exists.
Perform the “INTERMITTENT CONCERN TROUBLESHOOTING”.
4
INSPECT CKP SENSOR CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
•  Verify that the CKP sensor connector is connected securely.
•  Is connector normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Reconnect the connector, then go to Step 12.
5
INSPECT CKP CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO POWER SUPPLY
•  Turn engine switch off
•  Disconnect the CKP sensor connector.
•  Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
•  Measure the voltage between following terminals (harness-side):
―  CKP sensor terminal A
―  CKP sensor terminal B
―  CKP sensor terminal C
•  Is the voltage B+?
Yes
Repair or replace the suspected wiring harness, then go to Step 12.
No
Go to the next step.
6
INSPECT CKP CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO GROUND
•  Inspect for continuity between following terminal and body ground:
―  CKP sensor connector terminal A (harness-side)
―  CKP sensor connector terminal C (harness-side)
•  Is there continuity?
Yes
Repair or replace the suspected wiring harness, then go to Step 12.
No
Go to the next step.
7
INSPECT CKP CIRCUITS FOR SHORT CIRCUIT
•  Inspect for continuity between CKP sensor connector terminals (harness-side).
•  Are there continuity?
Yes
Repair or replace the suspected wiring harness, then go to Step 12.
No
Go to the next step.
8
INSPECT PCM CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
•  Disconnect the PCM connector.
•  Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out pins, corrosion).
•  Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair the terminal, then go to Step 12.
No
Go to the next step.
9
INSPECT CKP CIRCUIT FOR OPEN CIRCUIT
•  Inspect for continuity between the following circuits:
―  CKP sensor terminal A (harness-side) and PCM terminal 46 (harness-side)
―  CKP sensor terminal B (harness-side) and PCM terminal 65 (harness-side)
―  CKP sensor terminal C (harness-side) and PCM terminal 45 (harness-side)
•  Are there continuity?
Yes
Go to Step 12.
No
Repair or replace the suspected wiring harness, then go to Step 12.
10
VERIFY CKP SENSOR INSTALLATION CONDITION
•  Inspect for CKP sensor looseness.
•  Is CKP sensor loosen?
Yes
Retighten the CKP sensor installation bolt, then go to Step 12.
No
Go to the next step.
11
INSPECT CKP SENSOR
•  Turn the engine switch off.
•  Is the CKP sensor normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect the CKP sensor pulse wheel for damage. Replace the CKP sensor pulse wheel and go to the next step.
12
VERIFY TROUBLESHOOTING OF DTC P0337 COMPLETED
•  Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
•  Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
•  Start the engine and idle it.
•  Is the same DTC present?
Yes
Replace the PCM, go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
13
VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
•  Perform the Repair Verification Drive Mode.
•  Are any DTCs present?
Yes
Go to the applicable DTC inspection.
No
Troubleshooting completed.